District of Columbia statutes.
7-855

Applicability of §§ 7-852 and 7-853.

(a)

Section 7-852 shall apply on the first day of the month 120 days following April 4, 2001.

(b)

Section 7-853 shall apply to all health benefit plans issued or reissued beginning on the first day of the month 120 days following April 4, 2001.

History

Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-276, § 6, 48 DCR 1865